Alaska statutes. Title 13. Decedents’ Estates, Guardianships, Transfers, Trusts, and Health Care Decisions.
Article 3. Guardians of Incapacitated Persons.

Sec. 13.26.201.
Purpose and basis for guardianship.

Guardianship for an incapacitated person shall be used only as is necessary to promote and protect the well-being of the person, shall be designed to encourage the development of maximum self-reliance and independence of the person, and shall be ordered only to the extent necessitated by the person’s actual mental and physical limitations.
An incapacitated person for whom a guardian has been appointed is not presumed to be incompetent and retains all legal and civil rights except those that have been expressly limited by court order or have been specifically granted to the guardian by the court.

History.

(§ 4 ch 83 SLA 1981)

Revisor's notes. —

Formerly AS 13.26.090; renumbered in 2016.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The judicial determination of unsoundness of mind necessary to disqualify a mentally impaired individual from voting must be specifically raised in a guardianship hearing or raised in a separate proceeding. Division personnel could initiate such a proceeding. However, in the absence of implementing regulations, it is unlikely that the division would choose to do so. August 28, 1992 Op. Att’y Gen.

Secs. 13.26.205 — 13.26.210.
[Renumbered as AS 13.26.440 — 13.26.465.]

Sec. 13.26.211
Testamentary appointment of guardian for incapacitated person.

The parent of an incapacitated person may by will appoint a guardian of the incapacitated person. A testamentary appointment by a parent becomes effective when, after having given seven days’ prior written notice of intention to do so to the incapacitated person and to the person having care of the incapacitated person or to the incapacitated person’s nearest adult relative, the guardian files acceptance of appointment in the court in which the will is informally or formally probated, if, prior thereto, both parents are dead or the surviving parent is adjudged incapacitated. If both parents are dead, an effective appointment by the parent who died later has priority unless it is terminated by the denial of probate in formal proceedings.

The spouse of a married incapacitated person may by will appoint a guardian of the incapacitated person. The appointment becomes effective when, after having given seven days’ prior written notice of intention to do so to the incapacitated person and to the person having care of the incapacitated person or to the incapacitated person’s nearest adult relative, the guardian files acceptance of appointment in the court in which the will is informally or formally probated. An effective appointment by a spouse has priority over an appointment by a parent unless it is terminated by the denial of probate in formal proceedings.

This state recognizes a testamentary appointment effected by filing acceptance under a will probated at the testator’s domicile in another state.

On the filing with the court in which the will was probated of written objection to the appointment by the person for whom a testamentary appointment of guardian has been made, the appointment is terminated. An objection does not prevent appointment by the court in a proper proceeding of the testamentary nominee or any other suitable person upon an adjudication of incapacity in proceedings under AS

13.26.216

—

13.26.316

.

A testamentary appointment of a guardian by the parent of an incapacitated person, or by the spouse of a married incapacitated person, may grant all guardianship powers and duties that the deceased parent or spouse held, subject to modification by the court under AS

13.26.286

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972; am § 5 ch 83 SLA 1981; am § 14 ch 53 SLA 2008)

Revisor's notes. —

Formerly AS 13.26.095; renumbered in 2016 at which time “AS

13.26.216

—

13.26.316

” was substituted for “AS 13.26.100 —

13.26.150

” and “AS

13.26.286

” was substituted for “AS

13.26.125

”.

Sec. 13.26.215.
[Renumbered as AS 13.26.470.]

Sec. 13.26.216.
Venue.

The venue for guardianship proceedings for an incapacitated person is in the place where the incapacitated person resides or is present.
If the incapacitated person is admitted to an institution under order of a court of competent jurisdiction, venue is also in the judicial district in which that court sits.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972)

Revisor's notes. —

Formerly AS 13.26.100; renumbered in 2016.

Sec. 13.26.220.
[Renumbered as AS 13.26.475.]

Sec. 13.26.221.
Petition.

Any person may petition the court for a finding of incapacity and the appointment of a guardian for oneself or for another person.

The petition for appointment of a guardian must state

the name, age, and address of the petitioner and any relationship to the respondent;

the name, age, and present address of the respondent;

the name and address of the person or facility presently having care, custody, guardianship, or conservatorship of the respondent, if any, and the existence of any other restrictions on the legal capacity of the respondent to act in the respondent’s own behalf;

the nature and degree of the alleged incapacity;

the particular type and duration of appointment and the protection and assistance being sought;

the names and addresses, unless they are unknown and cannot reasonably be ascertained, of the individuals most closely related to the respondent by blood or marriage;

the facts supporting the allegations of incapacity and the need for appointment of a guardian;

the names and addresses of persons known to the petitioner who have knowledge that might prove helpful in determining the capacity and needs of the respondent.

The petition may also nominate a guardian and include a request for temporary guardianship as provided in AS

13.26.301

if the petitioner believes there is an imminent danger that the physical health or safety of the respondent will be seriously impaired during the pendency of the guardianship proceeding. A request for temporary guardianship must specify facts that cause the petitioner to believe that a temporary guardian is necessary.

[Repealed, § 31 ch 84 SLA 2004.]

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972; am § 6 ch 83 SLA 1981; am § 23 ch 21 SLA 2000; am § 31 ch 84 SLA 2004)

Revisor's notes. —

Formerly AS

13.26.105

; renumbered in 2016 at which time "AS

13.26.301

" was substituted for "AS

13.26.140

".

Sec. 13.26.225.
[Renumbered as AS 13.26.480.]

Sec. 13.26.226.
Initial court procedures.

Upon the filing of a petition, the court shall schedule a hearing on the issue of incapacity. The hearing shall be conducted within 120 days from the filing of the petition unless the court postpones the hearing for cause.

The respondent is entitled to be represented by an attorney in the proceedings. If the respondent is financially unable to employ an attorney, the court shall appoint the office of public advocacy (AS

44.21.400

) under AS

13.26.291

to represent the respondent in the proceedings.

The court shall appoint a visitor. The visitor shall arrange for evaluations to be performed and prepare a written report to be filed with the court. The court shall also appoint an expert who has expertise in regard to the alleged or admitted incapacity to investigate the issue of incapacity. The visitor shall interview the respondent and the person seeking appointment as guardian, if any. The visitor shall conduct the interviews and investigations necessary to prepare the report and shall arrange for the respondent to be examined by the expert appointed under this section. The expert’s written report shall be attached to the visitor’s report. Interviews and examinations shall take place in the respondent’s usual residence unless

the respondent consents to being examined or interviewed in a medical or mental health facility; or

the visitor considers it necessary to conduct interviews or examinations in a medical or mental health facility.

Appointment of the visitor and the expert under (c) of this section shall be made through the office of public advocacy (AS

44.21.400

) under AS

13.26.291

.

History.

(§ 7 ch 83 SLA 1981; am §§ 3, 4 ch 55 SLA 1984)

Revisor's notes. —

Formerly AS

13.26.105

; renumbered in 2016 at which time “AS

13.26.291

” was substituted for “AS

13.26.131

” in subsections (b) and (d).

Sec. 13.26.230.
[Renumbered as AS 13.26.485.]

Sec. 13.26.231.
Notice of rights of respondent.

Upon appointment, the visitor shall promptly

explain to the respondent, in a language or communication system the respondent can understand, the purpose of the interview and possible consequences of the proceedings;

serve a copy of the petition on the respondent in accordance with the procedure described in AS

13.06.110

;

explain and provide to the respondent a written statement of the following rights:

the respondent may communicate with an attorney or an expert in the field of the alleged incapacity before proceeding with the interview;

if the respondent does not have an attorney, an attorney, whose name, address, and telephone number shall be included in the statement, will be designated to advise and represent the respondent before and at any judicial hearings, and the attorney may arrange for an examination and consultation with an expert; and

the respondent may, instead, employ an attorney or expert of the respondent’s own choice; and

offer assistance to the respondent in contacting an attorney.

A substantive interview of the respondent or other investigation may not be conducted until the provisions of (a) of this section are satisfied.

History.

(§ 7 ch 83 SLA 1981)

Revisor's notes. —

Formerly AS 13.26.107; renumbered in 2016.

Cited in

In re Protective Proceeding of Amy D., 502 P.3d 5 (Alaska 2022).

Sec. 13.26.235.
[Renumbered as AS 13.26.490.]

Sec. 13.26.236.
Visitor’s report.

The visitor shall file with the court an evaluation report, proof of service of the petition upon the respondent, and proof of service of the report upon the respondent, the respondent’s attorney, and the petitioner, within 90 days after the date on which the petition was filed.

The visitor shall, as part of the evaluation report, explain alternatives to guardianship and recommend any that will safeguard the respondent’s essential requirements for physical health and safety. The evaluation report may recommend personal guardianship only if the visitor determines that the needs of the respondent cannot be met by other alternatives.

The evaluation report must include

the results and analyses of medical and other tests and examinations performed that describe the respondent’s mental, emotional, physical, and educational condition, adaptive behavior and social skills, and that specify the data on which the description is based;

recommendations regarding the types and extent of assistance, if any, necessary to meet the essential requirements for the physical health and safety of the respondent;

an evaluation of the respondent’s need for mental health treatment and whether there is a substantial probability that available treatment will significantly improve the respondent’s mental condition;

an evaluation of the respondent’s need for educational or vocational assistance or personal care and whether these can be made available to the respondent;

an evaluation of the probability that the incapacity may significantly lessen, and the type of services or treatment that will facilitate improvement in the respondent’s condition or skills;

a list of the names and addresses of all individuals who examined, interviewed, or investigated the respondent and of the names and addresses of all persons contacted in preparation of the report;

a summary of the information that

was supplied by the person described in (6) of this subsection; and

supports the conclusions of the report;

a description of the alternatives to guardianship that were considered and not recommended and an explanation of why they are not feasible to meet the respondent’s needs;

a description of the present home and living arrangement of the respondent and of any other proposed placement and a recommendation for the respondent’s living arrangement that provides the least restrictive setting necessary to protect the respondent from serious illness, injury, or disease; and

a specification of the financial resources of the respondent, the respondent’s entitlements to insurance benefits, and publicly operated or sponsored health, mental health, and welfare assistance that might be employed in the provision of services to the respondent.

If personal guardianship is recommended, the evaluation report required under this section must include a guardianship outline that identifies

potential guardians;

the specific services necessary and available to protect the respondent from serious injury, illness, or disease and, to the extent possible, to return the respondent to full capacity in handling the respondent’s own affairs;

the means by which the services described in (2) of this subsection may be financed;

the specific, least restrictive authority needed by the guardian to provide the services described in (2) of this subsection.

The petitioner and the respondent may file responses to the evaluation report within 10 days of receiving it. The court may grant additional time if requested for cause.

History.

(§ 7 ch 83 SLA 1981)

Revisor's notes. —

Formerly AS 13.26.108; renumbered in 2016.

Sec. 13.26.240.
[Renumbered as AS 13.26.495.]

Sec. 13.26.241.
Evaluations; right to remain silent; respondent’s attorney or expert.

A ward or respondent has the right to refuse to respond to questions in the course of examinations and evaluations. However, the ward or respondent may be required to submit to interviews for the purpose of ascertaining whether the ward or respondent lacks the capacity to make informed decisions about care and treatment services.

Statements of a ward or respondent in the course of evaluations, examinations, and treatment under AS

13.26.201

—

13.26.316

are privileged, confidential, and not admissible without the ward’s or respondent’s consent in any civil or criminal proceeding other than proceedings under AS

13.26.201

—

13.26.316

. A ward or respondent at all times has the right to refuse to answer questions if the answers may tend to incriminate the ward or respondent.

During an interview or a testing conducted under AS

13.26.201

—

13.26.316

, a ward or respondent has the right to be accompanied by an attorney or expert of the ward’s or respondent’s own choosing.

The court, if requested by a ward or respondent in preparation for and in connection with a hearing held under AS

13.26.201

—

13.26.316

, shall appoint an expert having expertise in regard to the alleged or admitted incapacity to examine the respondent and testify on the respondent’s behalf. The request shall be filed in court at least five days before the hearing. An expert appointed under this subsection may be the same expert appointed under AS

13.26.226(c)

.

History.

(§ 7 ch 83 SLA 1981; am §§ 15 — 17 ch 53 SLA 2008)

Revisor's notes. —

Formerly AS 13.26.109; renumbered in 2016 at which time “AS

13.26.201

—

13.26.316

” was substituted for “AS 13.26.090 —

13.26.150

” in four places and “AS

13.26.226(c)

” was substituted for “AS 13.26.106(c)”.

Sec. 13.26.245.
[Renumbered as AS 13.26.500.]

Sec. 13.26.246.
Duties and powers of attorney of ward or respondent.

The principal duty of an attorney representing a ward or respondent is to represent the ward or respondent zealously. Zealous representation includes at least

personal interviews with the ward or respondent; unless good cause exists, the first contact with the ward or respondent shall be at least two weeks before the hearing;

explaining, if possible, to the ward or respondent in terms that the ward or respondent can understand, the nature and possible consequences of the proceeding, the alternatives that are available, and the rights to which the ward or respondent is entitled;

securing and presenting evidence and testimony and offering arguments that would tend to protect the ward’s or respondent’s rights and that would tend to further the interests of the ward or respondent.

To the maximum extent possible, the ward or respondent shall remain responsible for determining the interests of the ward or respondent. However, the attorney for the ward or respondent may seek appointment of a guardian ad litem if the circumstances of AS

13.26.041

apply.

History.

(§ 7 ch 83 SLA 1981; am § 7 ch 84 SLA 2004)

Revisor's notes. —

Formerly AS

13.26.111

; renumbered in 2016 at which time “AS

13.26.041

” was substituted for “AS

13.26.025

”.

Sec. 13.26.250.
[Renumbered as AS 13.26.505.]

Sec. 13.26.251.
Hearing and determination.

At the hearing scheduled under AS

13.26.226

, the respondent has the right to

present evidence on the respondent’s own behalf;

cross-examine adverse witnesses;

remain silent;

have the hearing open or closed to the public as the respondent elects;

be present unless the court determines that the respondent’s conduct in the courtroom is so disruptive that the proceedings cannot reasonably continue with the respondent present;

be tried by jury on the issue of incapacity.

The burden of proof by clear and convincing evidence is upon the petitioner, and a determination of incapacity shall be made before consideration of proper disposition. If the respondent stipulates to incapacity, the court may make a finding of incapacity without obtaining evidence from the expert appointed under AS

13.26.226(c)

.

If the respondent is found to be incapacitated, the court shall determine the extent of the incapacity and the feasibility of alternatives to guardianship to meet the needs of the respondent.

If it is found that alternatives to guardianship are feasible and adequate to meet the needs of the respondent, the court may dismiss the action and order an alternative form of protection.

If it is found that the respondent is able to perform some, but not all, of the functions necessary to care for the respondent, and alternatives to guardianship are not feasible or adequate to provide for the needs of the respondent, the court may appoint a partial guardian, but may not appoint a full guardian.

If it is found that the respondent is totally without capacity to care for the respondent and that a combination of alternatives to guardianship and the appointment of a partial guardian is not feasible or adequate to meet the needs of the respondent, the court may appoint a full guardian.

If it is necessary to appoint a guardian, the court shall consider the ward’s preference.

At the time a guardian is appointed, the court shall make a reasonable effort to acquaint the ward with the ward’s right to request, at a later time, the guardian’s dismissal or a modification of the guardianship order. The court shall provide a written statement to the ward, explaining the ward’s rights and specifying the procedures to be followed in petitioning the court.

History.

(§ 7 ch 83 SLA 1981; am § 18 ch 53 SLA 2008)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

13.26.113

; renumbered in 2016 at which time “AS

13.26.226

” was substituted for “AS 13.26.106” and “AS

13.26.226

(c)” was substituted for “AS 13.26.106(c)”.

Sec. 13.26.255.
[Renumbered as AS 13.26.510.]

Sec. 13.26.256.
Psychotropic medication influencing wards or respondents at judicial hearings.

A ward or respondent has a right to participate to the maximum extent possible in all judicial proceedings concerning the ward or respondent and to be free from the influence of psychotropic medication during the proceedings.

It is the responsibility of the attorney for the ward or respondent to determine if the ward or respondent is being treated with psychotropic medication the effects of which would continue during the judicial proceedings and, if so, to inform the court in writing a reasonable time before the hearing.

The court, upon receipt of the information provided under (b) of this section, shall require a medical examination of the ward or respondent, if the court determines that the medical examination is necessary, and shall determine the advisability of continuation or suspension of the treatment for the duration of the judicial proceedings. The court may make any appropriate order it considers necessary. The court in making its determination shall balance the interest of maximum participation of the ward or respondent in the hearings against the medical and rehabilitative needs of the ward or respondent.

If the ward or respondent is under the influence of psychotropic medication during the judicial proceeding determining capacity, the trier of fact shall take that fact into consideration in making its determination.

History.

(§ 7 ch 83 SLA 1981)

Revisor's notes. —

Formerly AS 13.26.114; renumbered in 2016.

Secs. 13.26.257, 13.26.260.
[Renumbered as AS 13.26.515 and 13.26.520.]

Sec. 13.26.261.
Acceptance of appointment; consent to jurisdiction.

By accepting appointment, a guardian submits personally to the jurisdiction of the court in any proceeding relating to the guardianship that may be instituted by any interested person. Notice of any proceeding shall be delivered to the guardian or mailed by ordinary mail to the guardian’s address as listed in the court records and to the guardian’s address as then known to the petitioner.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972)

Revisor's notes. —

Formerly AS 13.26.115; renumbered in 2016.

Sec. 13.26.265.
[Renumbered as AS 13.26.525.]

Sec. 13.26.266.
Guardianship order.

If the court or jury determines that a person is incapacitated and the services of a guardian are necessary, the court shall enter an order that

names the guardian and establishes a guardian-ward relationship;

includes findings of fact that support each grant of authority to the guardian;

adopts a guardianship plan.

The guardianship plan shall specify the authority that the guardian has with regard to

medical care for the ward’s physical condition;

mental health treatment that the guardian considers to be in the ward’s best interests;

housing for the ward with consideration of the following:

the wishes of the ward;

the preferability of allowing the ward to retain local community ties; and

the requirement for services to be provided in the least restrictive setting;

personal care, educational and vocational services necessary for the physical and mental welfare of the ward and to return the ward to full capacity;

application for health and accident insurance and any other private or governmental benefits to which the ward may be entitled to meet any part of the costs of medical, mental health, or related services provided to the ward;

physical and mental examinations necessary to determine the ward’s medical and mental health treatment needs; and

control of the estate and income of the ward to pay for the cost of services that the guardian is authorized to obtain on behalf of the ward.

The guardianship plan may not be more restrictive of the liberty of the ward than is reasonably necessary to protect the ward from serious physical injury, illness or disease and to provide the ward with medical care and mental health treatment for physical and mental health. The guardianship plan shall be designed to encourage a ward to participate in all decisions that affect the ward and to act on the ward’s own behalf to the maximum extent possible. The court may not assign a duty or power to a guardian unless the need for it has been proven to the satisfaction of the court and no less restrictive alternative or combination of alternatives is sufficient to satisfy the need.

The duration of the term of guardianship shall be determined by the court order. Upon receipt of a report or other information that requires further consideration, the court may order a review hearing if it determines that the hearing is in the best interests of the ward.

History.

(§ 7 ch 83 SLA 1981)

Revisor's notes. —

Formerly AS 13.26.116; renumbered in 2016.

Sec. 13.26.270.
[Renumbered as AS 13.26.530.]

Sec. 13.26.271.
Guardianship implementation report.

Within 90 days after distribution of the order of appointment as guardian, the guardian shall submit to the court a report. The report must describe the guardian’s program for implementing the guardianship plan. The primary goal of the program described in the report must be, to the maximum extent possible, to develop or regain the ward’s abilities to handle the ward’s own affairs. The report must consider housing, medical care, and educational and vocational needs and resources. In developing the report, the guardian shall consult with the ward to the maximum extent possible. The report must specify the services that are necessary to meet the essential requirements for the ward’s physical health or safety and the means for obtaining the services. The report must specify the manner in which the guardian will exercise and share decision-making authority and other items that will assist in fulfilling the needs of the ward, the terms of the guardianship order, and the duties of the guardian.

History.

(§ 7 ch 83 SLA 1981; am § 8 ch 84 SLA 2004)

Revisor's notes. —

Formerly AS 13.26.117; renumbered in 2016.

Sec. 13.26.275.
[Renumbered as AS 13.26.535.]

Sec. 13.26.276.
Other reports.

A guardian shall submit a report to the court at least annually. In addition, every third year, the court shall appoint a visitor to file a report reviewing the guardianship during the period since the last visitor’s report, if any. The guardian shall submit an additional report to the court when

the court orders it;

there is a significant change in the capacity of the ward to meet the essential requirements for health and safety or to protect the ward’s rights;

the guardian resigns or is removed;

the guardianship is terminated; or

the ward requests it.

The report of the guardian must contain, but is not limited to, the following information:

the name and address of the ward and the guardian;

the ward’s present mental, physical, and social conditions and present living arrangements and the ward’s opinion of these arrangements;

changes in the capacity of the ward to meet essential requirements for physical health and safety;

the services being provided to the ward;

the significant actions taken by the guardian during the reporting period in regard to the ward;

a financial accounting of the estate that has been subject to the possession or control of the guardian;

a list of the number and nature of the contacts between the guardian and ward if the ward does not reside with the guardian;

any other information requested by the court or necessary or desirable in the opinion of the guardian.

The visitor report required by (a) of this section must include

the name and address of the ward and the guardian;

the services being provided to the ward by or through the guardian;

the significant actions taken by the guardian during the reporting period in regard to the ward;

a financial accounting of the estate that has been subject to the possession or control of the guardian;

a list of the number and nature of the contacts between the conservator and the ward if the ward does not reside with the guardian;

any other information requested by the court or necessary or desirable in the opinion of the visitor.

History.

(§ 7 ch 83 SLA 1981; am §§ 9, 10 ch 84 SLA 2004)

Revisor's notes. —

Formerly AS 13.26.118; renumbered in 2016.

Sec. 13.26.280.
[Renumbered as AS 13.26.540.]

Sec. 13.26.281.
Termination of guardianship for incapacitated person.

The authority and responsibility of a guardian for an incapacitated person terminates upon the death of the guardian or ward, the determination of incapacity of the guardian, the removal or resignation of the guardian as provided in AS

13.26.286

, or upon the expiration of the period specified by court order as the duration of the guardianship. Testamentary appointment under an informally probated will terminates if the will is later denied probate in a formal proceeding. Termination does not affect a guardian’s liability for prior acts nor an obligation to account for assets of the ward over which the guardian exercised control.

Notwithstanding (a) of this section, if a deceased ward does not have a living family member or if an individual interested in the ward is not available, the guardian of a ward who dies may arrange for the body of the ward to be transported to a funeral home and may make funeral and burial arrangements for the deceased ward. The guardian may also apply for assistance with burial expenses from the state or a municipality if the estate of the ward does not have sufficient money to pay for burial.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972; am § 27 ch 56 SLA 1973; am § 8 ch 83 SLA 1981; am § 11 ch 84 SLA 2004)

Revisor's notes. —

Formerly AS 13.26.120; renumbered in 2016 at which time “AS

13.26.286

” was substituted for “AS

13.26.125

”.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 32(b), ch. 84, SLA 2004, provides that (b) of this section “has the effect of changing Rule 16(f), Alaska Rules of Probate Procedure, by giving guardians additional authority to perform certain acts for a deceased ward.”

Sec. 13.26.285.
[Renumbered as AS 13.26.545.]

Sec. 13.26.286.
Removal or resignation of guardian; change in or termination of guardianship.

On petition of the ward, the guardian, or any person interested in the ward’s welfare, or on the court’s own motion, the court may (1) review and amend a decision of a guardian; or (2) if alternatives that are less restrictive than guardianship or less restrictive than the existing guardianship plan would assist the ward in meeting essential requirements for physical health and safety, modify the provisions of its order to (A) amend the guardianship plan or the responsibilities of the guardian; (B) remove a guardian and appoint a successor; or (C) terminate the guardianship. On petition of the guardian, the court may accept a resignation and make any other order that may be appropriate.

The ward, the guardian, or any person interested in the ward’s welfare may petition for an order that the ward is no longer incapacitated or no longer incapacitated to the same extent as the ward was when the original guardianship order was made or when the court last amended the guardianship order, and for removal or resignation of the guardian, termination of the guardianship, or a change in the responsibilities of the guardian. A request for this order may be made by informal letter to the court or judge and any person who knowingly interferes with transmission of this kind of request to the court or judge may be held in contempt of court.

Before removing a guardian, changing the guardian’s responsibilities, accepting the resignation of a guardian, or ordering that a ward’s guardianship be changed or terminated, the court, following the same procedures to safeguard the rights of the ward as apply to a petition for appointment of a guardian and applying the least restrictive alternative necessary to meet the needs of the ward after consideration of alternatives to guardianship services, may send a visitor to the residence of the present guardian and to the place where the ward resides or is detained, to observe conditions and report in writing to the court.

If at any time the ward requests or indicates to the guardian or to the agency responsible for the ward’s care or its employee that the ward desires a change in guardianship, the guardian or the agency providing care shall inform the court of the request or indication.

If the guardian dies, or if on the basis of a petition filed under this section or a report or other information, there is probable cause to believe a guardian is not performing the guardian’s responsibilities effectively and there is an imminent danger that the physical health or safety of the ward will be seriously impaired, the court shall take whatever action is necessary to protect the ward, including the dismissal of the guardian and appointment of a temporary guardian without a hearing.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972; am § 9 ch 83 SLA 1981; am § 12 ch 84 SLA 2004)

Revisor's notes. —

Formerly AS

13.26.125

; renumbered in 2016.

Sec. 13.26.290.
[Renumbered as AS 13.26.550.]

Sec. 13.26.291.
Costs in guardianship proceedings.

Subject to (d) of this section, the state shall bear the costs of the visitor and expert appointed under AS

13.26.226(c)

.

Subject to (c) and (d) of this section, the respondent shall bear the costs of the attorney appointed under AS

13.26.226(b)

, of the expert appointed under AS

13.26.241(d)

, of the guardian ad litem appointed under AS

13.26.041

, and of other court and guardianship costs incurred under this chapter.

The state shall pay all or part of the costs described in (b) of this section if the court finds that the payment is necessary to prevent the respondent from suffering financial hardship or from becoming dependent upon a government agency or a private person or agency.

The court may require the petitioner to pay all or some of the costs described in (a) and (b) of this section if the court finds that the petitioner initiated a proceeding under this chapter that was malicious, frivolous, or without just cause.

History.

(§ 7 ch 83 SLA 1981; am § 13 ch 84 SLA 2004)

Revisor's notes. —

Formerly
AS

13.26.131

; renumbered in 2016 at which time “ AS

13.26.226(c)

” was substituted for “ AS 13.26.106(c)”, “ AS

13.26.226(b)

” was substituted for “ AS 13.26.106(b)”, “ AS

13.26.241(d)

” was substituted for “ AS 13.26.109(d)”, and “ AS

13.26.041

” was substituted for “ AS

13.26.025

”.

Sec. 13.26.295.
[Renumbered as AS 13.26.555.]

Sec. 13.26.296.
Notices in guardianship proceedings.

In a proceeding for the appointment, change in responsibilities, or removal of a guardian, or termination of guardianship, other than the appointment of a temporary guardian or temporary suspension of a guardian, notice of hearing shall be given to each of the following:

the ward or respondent by the visitor as provided in AS

13.26.231

;

any person who is serving as guardian or conservator of the ward or respondent, or who has care and custody of the ward or respondent;

in case a person is not notified under (4) of this subsection, at least one of the closest adult relatives of the ward or respondent, if any can be found;

the spouse, parents, and adult children of the ward or respondent;

any person who performed an evaluation for the visitor’s report within the previous two years;

the ward’s or respondent’s attorney; and

the ward’s or respondent’s guardian ad litem if one has been appointed.

Notice shall be served personally, by certified mail, or by any other method authorized by court rule on the ward’s or respondent’s spouse and parents if they can be found within the state. Except as provided in (a)(1) of this section, notice to the spouse and parents, if they cannot be found within the state, and to all other persons shall be given as provided in AS

13.06.110

.

The notice must set out the date, time, place, purpose, and possible consequences of the hearing and the rights of the ward or respondent and any other parties to the proceedings.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972; am § 10 ch 83 SLA 1981; am § 24 ch 21 SLA 2000; am § 31 ch 84 SLA 2004; am § 19 ch 53 SLA 2008)

Revisor's notes. —

Formerly AS

13.26.135

; renumbered in 2016 at which time “AS

13.26.231

” was substituted for “AS 13.26.107”.

Sec. 13.26.300.
[Renumbered as AS 13.26.560.]

Sec. 13.26.301.
Temporary guardians; authorization of services.

If during the pendency of an initial petition for guardianship it appears that the respondent is in need of immediate services to protect the respondent against serious injury, illness, or disease and the respondent is not capable of procuring the necessary services, the petitioner may request the appointment of a temporary guardian to authorize the services. The request shall state the reasons and factual basis for the request. The petitioner shall immediately file the request with the court and serve copies on the respondent and the respondent’s attorney. The court shall conduct a hearing within 72 hours after the filing.

At the temporary guardianship hearing, the respondent shall have the rights set out in AS

13.26.251(a)

.

The burden of proof at the hearing shall be by clear and convincing evidence and shall be upon the petitioner.

If the court determines that a temporary guardian should be appointed, it shall make the appointment and grant to the guardian only the authority that is least restrictive upon the liberty of the respondent and that enables the temporary guardian to provide the emergency services necessary to protect the respondent from serious injury, illness, or disease.

The temporary guardianship shall expire at the time of the appointment of a full or partial guardian or upon the dismissal of the petition for guardianship.

If no guardianship petition is pending but the court is informed of a person who is apparently incapacitated and in need of emergency life-saving services, the court may authorize the services upon determining that delay until a guardianship hearing can be held would entail a life-threatening risk to the person.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972; am § 11 ch 83 SLA 1981)

Revisor's notes. —

Formerly AS

13.26.140

; renumbered in 2016 at which time “AS

13.26.251(a)

” was substituted for “AS 13.26.113(a)”.

Publisher’s note. —

In 2021 a correction was made to the history.

Sec. 13.26.305.
[Renumbered as AS 13.26.565.]

Sec. 13.26.306.
Emergency powers.

Notwithstanding the limits of a temporary guardianship or guardianship order, a temporary guardian and guardian at all times have the right to authorize the provision of emergency life-saving services.
This right includes the power to authorize hospitalization without advance court approval.

History.

(§ 12 ch 83 SLA 1981)

Revisor's notes. —

Formerly AS 13.26.141; renumbered in 2016.

Sec. 13.26.310.
[Renumbered as AS 13.26.570.]